Vermont, session 2025-2026, H427.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 12 V.S.A. § 1914 is added to read:
§ 1914. MEDICAL MALPRACTICE; LIMITATIONS ON DAMAGES
(a) The damages awarded for pain and suffering or other noneconomic loss
in an action based on medical malpractice shall not exceed the amount of:
(1) $250,000.00 per claimant if the defendant is a natural person; and
(2) $500,000.00 per claimant and $250,000.00 per defendant if the
defendant is not a natural person.
(b) The damages awarded for wrongful death in an action based on medical
malpractice shall not exceed the amount of $500,000.00 per claimant.
VT LEG #380514 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.427
2025 Page 2 of 18
(c) The amount of punitive damages awarded shall not exceed $200,000.00
or twice the total of economic and noneconomic losses, whichever is greater.
Sec. 2. 12 V.S.A. chapter 223 is added to read:
CHAPTER 223. SCREENING PANELS FOR
MEDICAL INJURY CLAIMS
§ 7401. FINDINGS, PURPOSE, AND INTENT
(a) Availability and affordability of insurance against liability for medical
injury is essential for the protection of patients as well as ensuring availability
of and access to essential medical and hospital care. This chapter affirms the
intent of the General Assembly to contain the costs of the medical injury
reparations system and to promote availability and affordability of insurance
against liability for medical injury. Claims for medical injury should be
resolved as early and inexpensively as possible to contain system costs.
Claims that are resolved before court determination cost less to resolve than
claims that must be resolved by a court. Meritorious claims should be
identified as quickly as possible, as should nonmeritorious claims. Defendants
should consider paying or compromising on meritorious claims, and plaintiffs
should consider withdrawing or compromising on nonmeritorious claims, as
soon as the merits of the claims are known to the parties. Presentation of
claims to a medical review panel is intended to help identify both meritorious
and nonmeritorious claims without the delay and expense of a court trial. It is
VT LEG #380514 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.427
2025 Page 3 of 18
essential to the effectiveness of the panel process that panel proceedings be
confidential unless and until a matter heard by a panel proceeds to trial. It is
equally essential to the effectiveness of the panel process that a panel’s
unanimous findings be presented to the jury in any matter that is not resolved
prior to trial. The panel process will encourage the prompt resolution of claims
because both sides will be given an objective view of the merits. If the panel
finds that a claim has merit, the defendant will be more likely to pay the claim
or negotiate a compromise that is favorable to the claimant. If the panel finds
that the claim lacks merit, the claimant is more likely to withdraw the claim or
accept a nominal settlement.
(b) The purposes of pretrial screening panels are:
(1) to identify claims of professional negligence that merit compensation
and to encourage early resolution of those claims prior to commencement of a
lawsuit; and
(2) to identify claims of professional negligence and to encourage early
withdrawal or dismissal of nonmeritorious claims.
§ 7402. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter:
(1) “Action for medical injury” means any action against a medical care
provider, whether based in tort, contract, or otherwise, to recover damages on
account of medical injury.
VT LEG #380514 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.427
2025 Page 4 of 18
(2) “Medical care provider” means a physician, physician assistant,
registered or licensed practical nurse, hospital, clinic, or other health care
agency licensed by the State or otherwise lawfully providing medical care or
services, or an officer, employee, or agent thereof acting in the course and
scope of employment.
(3) “Medical injury” or “injury” means any adverse, untoward, or
undesired consequences arising out of or sustained in the course of
professional services rendered by a medical care provider, whether resulting
from negligence, error, or omission in the performance of such services; from
rendition of such services without informed consent or in breach of warranty or
in violation of contract; from failure to diagnose; from premature abandonment
of a patient or of a course of treatment; from failure properly to maintain
equipment or appliances necessary to the rendition of such services; or
otherwise arising out of or sustained in the course of such services.
§ 7403. FORMATION AND PROCEDURE
(a) The Supreme Court shall maintain a list of retired judges, persons with
judicial experience, and other qualified persons to serve on screening panels
under this chapter from which the Chief Justice shall choose a panel chair
under subsection (b) of this section. The Court shall maintain lists of health
care practitioners and attorneys with litigation experience, recommended by
their respective professional organizations to serve on screening panels under
VT LEG #380514 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.427
2025 Page 5 of 18
this chapter. As directed by the Court, the professional organization of each
profession shall inform the Court of the names of volunteers to serve on
panels.
(b) Screening panel members shall be selected as follows:
(1) Upon the entry of a medical injury case, the clerk of the Superior
Court in which the medical injury case is filed shall notify the Chief Justice of
the Supreme Court.
(2) Within 14 days following the return date, the Chief Justice shall
choose a retired judge, a person with judicial experience, or other qualified
person from the list maintained by the Court to serve as chair of the panel to
screen the claim. If at any time the Chair chosen under this subsection is
unable or unwilling to serve, the Chief Justice shall appoint a replacement
following the procedure in this subsection for the initial appointment of the
Chair. Persons other than retired judges or those with judicial experience may
be appointed as chair based on appropriate trial experience. If the Chief
Justice appoints as chair a person who is not a retired judge or who does not
have judicial experience, each side may make one challenge to the
appointment.
(3) The Chief Justice shall notify the clerk of the name of the person
designated to serve as chair and shall provide the clerk with the lists of health
care practitioners, health care providers, and attorneys maintained under this
VT LEG #380514 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.427
2025 Page 6 of 18
section. Upon notification of the Chief Justice’s choice of chair, the clerk shall
notify the Chair and the parties, and provide them with the lists of health care
practitioners, health care providers, and attorneys. The Chair shall choose two
or three additional panel members from the lists as follows:
(A) One attorney.
(B) One health care practitioner. If possible, the Chair shall choose a
practitioner who practices in the same specialty or profession as the person or
entity accused of professional negligence.
(C) Where the claim involves more than one person accused of
professional negligence, the Chair may choose a fourth panel member who is a
health care practitioner. If possible, the Chair shall choose a practitioner or
provider in the specialty or profession of a person accused.
(D) When agreed upon by all the parties, the list of available panel
members may be enlarged in order to select a panel member who is agreed to
by the parties but who is not on the Court’s list.
(4) The screening panel process is not intended to delay or postpone the
trial of a medical injury case. The Superior Court may establish a trial date
and all interim deadlines as it would in any other case.
(5) The Supreme Court shall establish the compensation of the panel
Chair if the Chair is not otherwise compensated by the State. Other panel
members shall serve without compensation or payment of expenses.
VT LEG #380514 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.427
2025 Page 7 of 18
(6) The clerk of the Superior Court in the unit in which a medical injury
case is filed shall, with the consent of the Supreme Court, provide clerical and
other assistance to the panel Chair.
(7) Only challenges for cause shall be allowed. If a panel member other
than the Chair is challenged for cause, the party challenging the member shall
notify the panel Chair. If the panel Chair finds cause for the challenge, the
Chair shall replace the panel member. If the Chair is challenged for cause, the
party challenging the Chair shall notify the Chief Justice, who shall replace the
Chair upon a finding of cause.
(8) The panel, through the Chair, shall have the same subpoena power as
exists for a Superior Judge. The Chair shall have sole authority, without
requiring the agreement of other panel members, to issue subpoenas.
(9) The Vermont Rules of Civil Procedure shall govern discovery
conducted under this chapter. The parties shall attempt in good faith to resolve
discovery issues themselves. The Chair shall rule on disputes regarding
discovery. Any person aggrieved by a Chair’s ruling regarding discovery may
appeal to the Civil Division of the Superior Court, which shall defer to the
Chair’s factual findings unless they are clearly erroneous.
§ 7404. PANEL PROCEDURES
(a) All documents filed with the Court in a medical injury action that are
part of the screening process are confidential.
VT LEG #380514 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.427
2025 Page 8 of 18
(b) Within 20 days after the return date, the person or persons accused shall
contact the claimant’s counsel and by agreement shall designate a timetable for
filing all the relevant medical and provider records necessary to a
determination by the panel. If the parties are unable to agree on a timetable
within 60 days after the return date, the claimant shall notify the Chair of the
panel. The Chair shall then establish a timetable for the filing of all relevant
records and reasonable discovery, which shall be filed at least 30 days before
any hearing date. The hearing shall be not later than six months from the
return date, except when the time period has been extended by the panel Chair
in accordance with this chapter.
(c) The pretrial screening may be bypassed if all parties agree upon a
resolution of the claim by trial.
(d) All parties to a claim may, by written agreement, submit a claim to the
binding determination of the panel. Both parties may agree to bypass the panel
for any reason or may request that certain preliminary legal affirmative
defenses or issues be litigated prior to submission of the case to the panel. The
panel shall have no jurisdiction to hear or decide, absent agreement of the
parties, dispositive legal affirmative defenses, other than comparative
negligence. The panel Chair may require the parties to litigate, by motion,
dispositive legal affirmative defenses in the Civil Division of the Superior
Court prior to submission of the case to the panel. Any such defense, as well
VT LEG #380514 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.427
2025 Page 9 of 18
as any motion relating to discovery that the panel Chair has chosen not to rule
on, may be presented by motion to the Court.
(e) Except as otherwise provided in this section, there shall be one
combined hearing for all claims under this section arising out of the same set
of facts. When a medical injury case has been filed against more than one
person accused of medical injury based on the same facts, the parties may,
upon agreement of all parties, require that hearings be separated. The Chair
may, for good cause, order separate hearings.
(f) All requests for extensions of time under this section shall be made to
the panel Chair. The Chair may extend any time period for good cause, except
that the Chair may not extend any time period that would result in the hearing
being held more than 11 months following the return date, unless good cause is
shown.
(g)(1)(A) On failure of the plaintiff to prosecute or to comply with rules or
any order of the Chair or if the plaintiff fails to attend a properly scheduled
hearing, and on motion by the Chair or any party, after notice to all parties has
been given and the party against whom sanctions are proposed has had the
opportunity to be heard and show good cause, the Chair may order appropriate
sanctions, which may include dismissal of the case. If any sanctions are
imposed, the Chair shall state the sanctions in writing and include the grounds
for the sanctions.
VT LEG #380514 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.427
2025 Page 10 of 18
(B) Unless the Chair or the panel in an order for dismissal specifies
otherwise, a dismissal under this subdivision (1) is with prejudice for purposes
of proceedings before the panel. A dismissal with prejudice is the equivalent
of a finding for the defendant on all issues before the panel.
(2)(A) On failure of a defendant to comply with the rules or any order of
the Chair, or if a defendant fails to attend a properly scheduled hearing, and on
motion by the Chair or any party, after notice to all parties has been given and
the party against whom sanctions are proposed has had the opportunity to be
heard and show good cause, the Chair may order appropriate sanctions, which
may include default. If any sanctions are imposed, the Chair shall state the
sanctions in writing and include the grounds for the sanctions.
(B) Unless the Chair or the panel in its order for default specifies
otherwise, a default under this subdivision (2) is the equivalent of a finding
against the defendant on all issues before the panel.
(3) Any person aggrieved by a Chair’s ruling regarding sanctions may
appeal to the Superior Court, which shall defer to the Chair’s factual findings
unless they are clearly erroneous.
§ 7405. HEARING
(a)(1) The claimant or a representative of the claimant shall present the
case before the panel. The person accused of professional negligence or that
person’s representative shall make a responding presentation. The panel shall
VT LEG #380514 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.427
2025 Page 11 of 18
afford the parties wide latitude in the conduct of the hearing including, but not
limited to, the right of examination and cross-examination by attorneys.
Depositions are admissible whether or not the person deposed is available at
the hearing. The Chair shall make all procedural rulings, which shall be final.
The Vermont Rules of Evidence shall not apply. Evidence shall be admitted if
it is the kind of evidence upon which reasonable persons are accustomed to
rely in the conduct of their affairs. The panel shall make findings upon
evidence presented at the hearing, the records, and any expert opinions
provided by or sought by the panel or the parties.
(2) After presentation by the parties, the panel may request additional
facts, records, or other information from either party to be submitted in writing
or at a continued hearing, which continued hearing shall be held as soon as
possible. The continued hearing shall be attended by the same members of the
panel who have sat on all prior hearings in the same claim, unless otherwise
agreed by all parties. Replacement panel members shall be appointed pursuant
to this chapter.
(b) The panel shall maintain an electronically recorded record. Except as
provided in section 7408 of this title, the record shall not be made public, and
the hearings shall not be public without the consent of all parties.
(c) The Chair of the panel shall attempt to mediate any differences of the
parties before proceeding to findings.
VT LEG #380514 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.427
2025 Page 12 of 18
§ 7406. FINDINGS BY PANEL
(a) At the conclusion of the presentations, the panel shall make its findings
regarding negligence and causation in writing within 30 days by answering the
following questions:
(1) whether the acts or omissions complained of constitute a deviation
from the applicable standard of care by the medical care provider charged with
that care;
(2) whether the acts or omissions complained of proximately caused the
injury complained of; and
(3) if fault on the part of the medical care provider is found, whether any
fault on the part of the patient was equal to or greater than the fault on the part
of the provider.
(b) The standard of proof used by the panel shall be as follows:
(1) The plaintiff shall prove negligence and proximate causation by a
preponderance of the evidence.
(2) The defendant shall prove comparative negligence by a
preponderance of the evidence.
§ 7407. NOTIFICATION OF FINDINGS
The panel’s findings, signed by the panel members, indicating their vote,
shall be sent by registered or certified mail to the parties within seven days
following the date of the findings. The findings and record of the hearing shall
VT LEG #380514 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.427
2025 Page 13 of 18
be preserved until 30 days after final judgment or final resolution of the case,
after which time they shall be destroyed. All medical and provider records
shall be returned to the party providing them to the panel.
§ 7408. CONFIDENTIALITY AND ADMISSIBILITY
(a) Except as provided in this section, all proceedings before the panel,
including its final determinations, shall be treated as private and confidential
by the panel and the parties to the claim.
(1) The findings and other writings of the panel and any evidence and
statements made by a party or a party’s representative during a panel hearing
are not admissible in Court, shall not be submitted or used for any purpose in a
subsequent trial, and shall not be publicly disclosed, except as follows:
(A) Any testimony or writings made under oath may be used in
subsequent proceedings for purposes of impeachment.
(B) The party who made a statement or presented evidence may
agree to the submission, use, or disclosure of that statement or evidence.
(2) If the panel findings as to both the questions under subdivisions
7406(a)(1) and (2) of this title are unanimous and unfavorable to the defendant,
the findings are admissible in any subsequent trial of the medical injury case.
(3) If the panel findings as to any question under subsection 7406(a) of
this title are unanimous and unfavorable to the plaintiff, the findings are
admissible in any subsequent trial of the medical injury case.
VT LEG #380514 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.427
2025 Page 14 of 18
(b) The confidentiality provisions of this section shall not apply if the
findings were influenced by fraud.
(c) The deliberations and discussion of the panel and the testimony of any
expert, whether called by a party or the panel, shall be privileged and
confidential, and no such person may be asked or compelled to testify at a later
court proceeding concerning the deliberations, discussions, findings, or expert
testimony or opinions expressed during the panel hearing, unless by the party
who called and presented the nonparty expert, except such deliberation,
discussion, and testimony as may be required to prove an allegation of fraud.
§ 7409. MANDATORY INSTRUCTIONS
(a) When panel findings are offered and admitted into evidence in a
subsequent court action in accordance with section 7408 of this title, the Court
shall provide the following information to the jury to provide a basis for the
jury to understand the nature of the panel findings and to put the panel findings
in context in evaluating all of the evidence presented at the trial:
(1) The panel process is a preliminary procedural step through which
malpractice claims proceed.
(2) The panel in this case consisted of (insert the name and identity of
the members).
(3) The panel conducts a summary hearing and is not bound by the rules
of evidence.
VT LEG #380514 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.427
2025 Page 15 of 18
(4) The hearing is not a substitute for a full trial and may or may not
have included all of the evidence that is presented at the trial.
(5) The jury is not bound by the findings of the panel, and it is the
jurors’ duty to reach their own conclusions based on all of the evidence
presented to them.
(6) The panel proceedings are privileged and confidential.
Consequently, the parties shall not introduce panel documents or present
witnesses to testify about the panel proceedings, and they shall not comment
on the panel findings or proceedings except as provided in subdivisions (1)
through (5) of this subsection.
(b) The information specified in subsection (a) of this section shall be
provided to the jury when the findings are admitted into evidence and when the
Court instructs the jury prior to submitting the case to the jury.
§ 7410. EFFECT OF PANEL FINDINGS
Unanimous findings entered by the panel under subsection 7606(a) of this
title shall be implemented as follows:
(1) If findings are in the plaintiff’s favor, the defendant shall promptly
enter into negotiations to pay the claim or admit liability. If liability is
admitted, the claim may be submitted to the panel, upon agreement of the
parties, for determination of damages. If the claim goes to a trial, the findings
of the panel are admissible as provided in subdivision 7408(a)(2) of this title.
VT LEG #380514 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.427
2025 Page 16 of 18
(2) If the findings are in the defendant’s favor, the plaintiff shall release
the claim or claims based on the findings, without payment, or be subject to the
admissibility of those findings under subdivision 7408(a)(3) of this title.
§ 7411. REPORTS
(a) The Court Administrator shall collect data on medical injury claims and
submit a report on the screening panel process to the House and Senate
Committees on Judiciary and to the Commissioner of the Department of
Financial Regulation on or before September 30 of each year.
(b) The report required by this section shall include the number of medical
injury cases filed, pending, and resolved; the number of panel hearings; and the
number of panel hearing days during the fiscal year ending on the June 30
preceding the report date.
(c) The report required by this section shall include, for medical injury
cases resolved during the fiscal year:
(1) The mean and median lengths of time from initial filing to final
resolution.
(2) The number and average settlement amount of cases that were
resolved prior to the panel hearing.
(3) The number and average settlement amount of cases that were
resolved after a panel hearing but before a trial.
VT LEG #380514 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.427
2025 Page 17 of 18
(4) The number and average settlement amount of cases that were
resolved by or after a jury verdict.
(d) The report required by this section shall include, for medical injury
cases in which a panel made findings during the fiscal year:
(1) the number of cases that fell into each of the following categories of
possible panel hearing results:
(A) unanimous for the plaintiff;
(B) majority for the plaintiff;
(C) unanimous for the defendant; and
(D) majority for the defendant; and
(2) the status, and, if applicable, the results of the cases in each of the
categories listed in subdivision (1) of this subsection.
(e) To the extent possible, the report required by this section shall include
comparative data from the previous five years.
(f) The Commissioner of Financial Regulation shall report to the House
and Senate Committees on Judiciary annually, on or before November 1 of
each year, on the medical malpractice market and the effects of the panel
process established in this chapter. The report shall include, but not be limited
to, the average rates of medical liability insurance for categories of medical
providers and specialties identified by the Commissioner, the frequency and
VT LEG #380514 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.427
2025 Page 18 of 18
severity of medical injury claims, and the time for resolution of medical injury
claims from first notice to final resolution.
(g) The Commissioner of Financial Regulation may adopt rules to collect
the data from insurers necessary to prepare the report required by this section.
To the extent the Commissioner collects information from insurers regarding
individual claims, loss adjustment and other expenses, reserves, indemnity
payments, or other financial information that is not otherwise reported to the
Commissioner and available to the public, the information shall be treated as
examination materials and kept confidential.
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #380514 v.1